Connecticut, session 2026, SB00159.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
That the State Bond Commission be empowered to authorize the
issuance of bonds of the state in accordance with section 3-20 of the
general statutes, in principal amounts not exceeding in the aggregate
one million dollars, the proceeds of which shall be used by the
Department of Economic and Community Development for the purpose
of providing a grant-in-aid to the town of Sprague to extend the Sprague
Streetscape Project to upgrade all three municipal playgrounds, finish
upgrading all streetlights to the same standard as the streetlights located
on Main Street in the village of Baltic by installing ten streetlights and
flashing lights for both schools and install an informational electronic
bulletin board.